District of Columbia statutes.
38-913

Subsistence and transportation of children with disabilities.

The Board of Education is authorized to provide for the furnishing of subsistence supplies and transportation for children with severe disabilities attending special education schools or classes established for their benefit in the public school system of the District of Columbia.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 508, Pub. L. 93-140, § 21
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 53, 53 DCR 6198
D.C. Law 16-305, in the section heading, substituted “children with disabilities” for “handicapped children”; and substituted “children with severe disabilities” for “severely handicapped children”.
1973 Ed., § 31-1120.
1981 Ed., § 31-2213.